Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-563
Self-insurer; certificate; issuance.

The department may, in its discretion, upon the application of such a person, issue a certificate of self-insurance when it is satisfied that such person is possessed and will continue to be possessed of ability to pay judgments obtained against such person.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 63, p. 503.